Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201885-308
State colleges; purpose; courses.

The purpose of the state colleges is the training and instruction of persons, both male and female, in the arts of teaching and managing schools, the principles and practice of the various branches of learning taught in our public schools, and the arts and sciences generally. The Board of Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges shall have power to prescribe, for the state colleges, such courses of instruction as will best fit such persons for teaching and managing the public schools, and their instruction in the arts and sciences generally as provided in sections 85-194, 85-308, 85-606.01, 85-917 to 85-966, and 85-1511.

Laws 1881, c. 78, sub. XIII, § 15, p. 376;

R.S.1913, § 7072;

Laws 1921, c. 65, § 1, p. 252;

C.S.1922, § 6707;

C.S.1929, § 85-316;

Laws 1937, c. 212, § 5, p. 850;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 85-316;

R.S.1943, § 85-308;

Laws 1949, c. 315, § 2(1), p. 1035;

Laws 1969, c. 852, § 7, p. 3202;

Laws 1978, LB 756, § 55;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 1078;

Laws 2017, LB512, § 23.